North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-62.3 Tuition Assistance Grant Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3]

15-62.3-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.

15-62.3-02.
Administration of tuition assistance grant program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.

15-62.3-03.
Tuition assistance grant eligibility — Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.

15-62.3-04.
Tuition assistance grant maximum. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.

15-62.3-05.
Tuition assistance grant duration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.

15-62.3-06.
Distribution of grant funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 3.